Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 9. Foreign Branch Banking

Severability. —

Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 4, provides: “If any provision of this act or the application of such provision is found by any court of competent jurisdiction in the United States to be invalid as to any bank, bank holding company, foreign bank, or other person or circumstances, or to be superseded by federal law, the remaining provisions of this act shall not be affected and shall continue to apply to any bank, bank holding company, foreign bank, or other person or circumstance.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 156 to 169.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking § 28.

§ 13-2-901.
Purpose.

This article is intended generally to ensure that:

Interstate state branches of out-of-state foreign banks may be established and operated in this state:

To the extent consistent with the provisions of 12 U.S.C. section 3103; and

Under terms and conditions that are comparable to and no less favorable than those applicable to the establishment of interstate federal branches in this state by out-of-state foreign banks.

The laws and regulations of this state applicable to the establishment of interstate state branches in this state by out-of-state banks do not, in a manner inconsistent with the laws and policies of the United States, discriminate against the establishment of interstate state branches in this state by out-of-state domestic banks that are owned or controlled by foreign banks or other foreign persons.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-2-902.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Foreign bank” means any company organized under the laws of a foreign country, a territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa or the Virgin Islands, that engages directly in the business of banking. The term includes foreign commercial banks, foreign merchant banks and other foreign institutions that engage in banking activities usual in connection with the business of banking in countries where the foreign institutions are organized or operating;

“Home state” means as defined in W.S. 13-2-802(a)(vi);

“Interstate federal branch” means a branch of an out-of-state foreign bank established pursuant to 12 U.S.C. section 3103(a)(1);

“Interstate Wyoming state branch” means a branch of an out-of-state foreign bank that is established in this state pursuant to 12 U.S.C. section 3103(a)(2);

“Out-of-state foreign bank” means a foreign bank, the home state of which is a state other than Wyoming;

“Out-of-state bank” means a bank, the home state of which is a state other than Wyoming;

“State” means as defined in W.S. 13-2-802(a)(xiv).

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-2-903.
Establishment of interstate branches by out-of-state foreign banks.

An out-of-state foreign bank may establish an interstate Wyoming state branch in the same manner as, and subject to the same criteria, standards, conditions, requirements and procedures applicable to the establishment of interstate branches in this state by an out-of-state bank having the same home state in the United States.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 1.

§ 13-2-904.
Establishment of interstate branches by out-of-state domestic banks owned or controlled by foreign banks or other foreign persons.

An out-of-state domestic bank owned or controlled by a foreign bank or other foreign person may establish an interstate Wyoming state branch in the same manner as, and subject to the same criteria, standards, conditions, requirements and procedures applicable to the establishment of interstate branches in this state by an out-of-state bank having the same home state in the United States.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 75, § 1.